Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-811
Controversy between spouses; jurisdiction of court.

Whenever any controversy exists between spouses which may, unless a reconciliation is achieved, result in the dissolution or annulment of the marriage or in the disruption of the household, and there is any minor child of the spouses or of either of them whose welfare might be affected thereby, the conciliation court shall have jurisdiction over the controversy, and over the parties thereto and all persons having any relation to the controversy as further provided in sections 42-801 to 42-823.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 11, p. 658.